West Virginia, session 2026, HB5426.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 12D. WEST VIRGINIA NOXIOUS WEED ACT. §19-12D-13. Bradford Peat Pear. The Pyrus Calleryana, including all cultivars such as, but not limited to. Bradford Peat Pear,is a detriment to agriculture in West Virginia and is hereby declared to be a noxious weed.